Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB683.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 148 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Authority" or "BIDA" means the Burnside Island Development Authority
established in Section 2 of this Act;
(2) "BIDA region" means Pulaski County and all of the adjacent counties;
(3) "Board" means the board of directors of BIDA;
(4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department for Local
Government;
(5) "Day" means any calendar day;
(6) "Department" means the Department of Parks; and
(7) "General Burnside Island State Park" means an approximately four hundred
thirty (430) acre island surrounded by the Big South Fork Cumberland River that
is located in the Lake Cumberland basin in Pulaski County and situated within
the city limits of the City of Burnside, and any other successor park.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 148 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Burnside Island Development Authority is hereby established as an
independent, de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the
Commonwealth and shall exercise all powers that a corporation may lawfully
exercise under the laws of the Commonwealth. The authority shall be a public
body corporate established with all the general corporate powers incidental
thereto. The authority shall be attached to the Department for Local Government
for administrative purposes only. The authority shall be authorized for a period of
five (5) years from the effective date of this Act, may be renewed by the General
Page 1 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
Assembly, and may adopt bylaws and promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the orderly conduct of its affairs.
(2) The purpose of the authority is to develop, finance, operate, maintain, improve,
and promote lodging and restaurant facilities and recreational amenities on
General Burnside Island State Park and the surrounding area for public park
purposes to increase economic development, tourism, and outdoor recreation for
residents and visitors, except as limited by subsection (1)(b) of Section 4 of this
Act.
(3) The authority shall be governed by a board of directors, established in
accordance with Section 3 of this Act.
(4) (a) The authority and board shall become operational when a majority of the
members of the board have been appointed. Within fourteen (14) days of the
authority and board being operational, the commissioner shall notify the
Pulaski County judge/executive, the mayor of the City of Burnside, and the
board members listed in Section 3 of this Act that the requirements have
been met for the authority and board to become operational.
(b) The commissioner shall establish a date, time, and place for an initial
organizational meeting of the board, to be held within thirty (30) days of
notification required in paragraph (a) of this subsection. The commissioner
shall serve as interim chair of the initial organizational meeting until such
time as a chair is elected by a majority of the board members. The chair, or
interim chair, as appropriate, shall make the final determination in the
event of a tie vote of the board.
(5) The authority shall comply with:
(a) KRS Chapter 65A;
(b) The Open Meetings Act, KRS 61.805 to 61.850; and
(c) The Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
Page 2 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 148 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall consist of the following members:
(a) The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her
designee;
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Local Government or his or her
designee;
(c) The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources or his
or her designee;
(d) The Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee;
(e) Two (2) members appointed by the Governor from a list of six (6) persons
submitted by the mayor of the City of Burnside;
(f) Two (2) members appointed by the Governor from a list of six (6) persons
submitted by the county judge/executive of Pulaski County;
(g) The mayor of the City of Burnside or his or her designee;
(h) The executive director of the Burnside Tourism and Recreation
Commission or his or her designee;
(i) The county judge/executive of Pulaski County or his or her designee;
(j) The executive director of the Somerset-Pulaski County Convention and
Visitors Bureau or his or her designee;
(k) One (1) State Representative from the BIDA region appointed to a two (2)
year term by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who shall serve
as an ex officio nonvoting member and shall not serve another term
consecutively with a prior term; and
(l) One (1) State Senator from the BIDA region appointed to a two (2) year
term by the President of the Senate, who shall serve as an ex officio
nonvoting member and shall not serve another term consecutively with a
Page 3 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
prior term.
(2) (a) The terms of the appointed members of the board shall be three (3) years.
All appointments or reappointments made by the Governor shall be subject
to Senate confirmation in accordance with KRS 11.160.
(b) If a vacancy occurs among the appointed members of the board, the
unexpired term shall be filled pursuant to the requirements and procedures
for the original appointments.
(3) (a) The board shall meet at least once every quarter to perform all duties as
prescribed by Sections 1 to 6 of this Act and as may be prescribed in the
authority's bylaws. The board chair may call special meetings at any time.
(b) Notice of each meeting shall be made in writing and delivered to board
members at least seven (7) days before the scheduled meeting date. Email is
an acceptable form of notice of special meetings, so long as it is sent to
directors at least seven (7) days before the scheduled meeting date.
(c) Accommodations shall be made for remote attendance for each board
meeting, whether regular or special, through means such as video
conferencing, conference call, or similar services.
(d) A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum.
Vacant board positions shall be counted against the quorum total necessary
for board action.
(e) The board shall comply with the Open Meetings Act, KRS 61.805 to 61.850,
and the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(4) The board:
(a) Shall elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, treasurer, and any other officers as
established in the bylaws of the board;
(b) May appoint temporary and standing committees to accomplish the
purposes of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act and shall clearly describe the role,
Page 4 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
responsibilities, and tenure of each committee so created;
(c) Shall adopt bylaws for the management and regulation of its affairs and all
other matters necessary to effect proper management and accountability of
the board. The bylaws shall include, at a minimum, the following:
1. The powers and duties of the board's members and the manner and
number of officers to be elected from among the board members; and
2. The terms, conditions, and manner in which a board member may be
removed;
(d) Shall review and approve an annual budget;
(e) May seek administrative and management assistance through written
agreements with state agencies, local area development districts, or local
governing bodies; and
(f) May employ an executive director to act as its chief executive officer to
serve at its will and pleasure.
(5) Board members shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for
actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties,
subject to Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations. Board
members may have their lodging reimbursed by BIDA. Any reimbursement
requests exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) per person shall be submitted to
the Department for Local Government for approval.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 148 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The authority shall:
1. Supervise the design, construction, financing, operations, and
maintenance of lodging facilities, restaurants, boat facilities, and
other recreational or entertainment facilities, and conduct any other
improvements it deems necessary on General Burnside Island State
Page 5 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
Park, and any other property or facilities built, acquired, or leased
pursuant to its powers under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, through a
public-private partnership;
2. Assume all administrative and management functions of the
department for the facilities and amenities on General Burnside
Island State Park that are included in the public-private partnership
agreement, according to the terms of a public-private partnership
agreement; and
3. Procure insurance against any losses in connection with its property,
licenses, easements, operations, assets, or contracts, including hold-
harmless agreements, in the amounts and from the insurers as the
board considers desirable.
(b) The authority shall not operate or maintain the existing eighteen (18) hole
golf course, campground, or boat ramp facilities. A private partner may
negotiate access to the golf course, campground, or boat ramp with the
department, which the department shall not unreasonably withhold.
(2) The board may carry out any of the following to accomplish the purposes of
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(a) Acquire, own, and hold property, and all interests therein, by deed,
purchase, gift, devise, bequest, or lease, or by transfer from the State
Property and Buildings Commission, except that the authority shall not
acquire property through the exercise of the power of eminent domain;
(b) Dispose of any property acquired in any manner provided by law;
(c) Lease property, whether as lessee or lessor, and acquire or grant through
easement, license, or other appropriate legal form, the right to develop and
use property and open it to the use of the public;
(d) In accordance with KRS 148.255, acquire authorization of the General
Page 6 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
Assembly prior to sale, trade, or disposal of real property valued greater
than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) that is owned by the
Commonwealth and managed by the department;
(e) Mortgage or otherwise grant security interests in its property;
(f) Maintain sinking funds and reserves as the board determines appropriate
for the purposes of meeting future monetary obligations and needs of the
authority;
(g) Sue and be sued, plead and be impleaded, or complain and defend in any
court;
(h) Make contracts and execute instruments necessary for carrying on its
business, including contracts with any state agency, the federal government,
or any person, individual, partnership, or corporation to affect any or all of
the purposes of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act;
(i) Accept appropriations, grants, and loans and enter into contracts and other
transactions with any federal agency, regional commission, or state agency
for accomplishing the purposes of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act;
(j) Receive revenue from a public-private partnership agreement;
(k) Borrow money and issue bonds, security interests, or notes;
(l) Provide for and secure the payment of the bonds, security interests, or
notes;
(m) Provide for the rights of the holders of the bonds, security interests, or
notes;
(n) Purchase, hold, and dispose of any of its bonds, security interests, or notes;
(o) Accept gifts or grants of property, security interests, money, labor, supplies,
or services from any governmental unit or from any person, firm, or
corporation;
(p) Establish a fee-based system of permits, user registrations, or other facility
Page 7 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
access mechanisms as follows:
1. The fees may be imposed for access to and use of the trails, parking at
lodging facilities, visitor centers, or other park-related recreational
purpose facilities or recreation activities, or as an admission to an
event, that are subject to a public-private partnership agreement
between BIDA and its private partner;
2. The fees shall be decided by the board; and
3. BIDA shall retain and use the revenue from fees for any purposes
consistent with Sections 1 to 6 of this Act;
(q) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to govern the use and maintenance of General Burnside Island State
Park and any other matters for effective management of BIDA; and
(r) Exercise all of the powers that a corporation may lawfully exercise under
the laws of the Commonwealth.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45A.077 or 65.028(12) or any other provision of law to the
contrary, solicitation of a public-private partnership shall be subject to KRS
65.028, except that any public-private partnership shall be authorized by the
General Assembly by inclusion in an executive branch budget bill or any other
means specified by the General Assembly that explicitly identifies and authorizes
the utilization of a public-private partnership delivery method for the applicable
capital project.
(4) This section shall not be construed as a waiver of sovereign immunity.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 148 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Revenue bonds and revenue refunding bonds of the authority issued under
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act do not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or of any
political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the
Page 8 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
Commonwealth or of any political subdivision, but the bonds shall be payable
solely from the revenues resulting from the issuance of bonds or assets of the
authority.
(2) All bonds shall contain on the face of the bond a statement to the effect that
neither the Commonwealth nor any political subdivision of the Commonwealth is
obligated to pay the bond or the interest on the bond, except from revenues of the
project or projects for which they are issued. Obligations issued under this section
shall not be deemed a debt, liability, or obligation of the Commonwealth or of any
political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the
Commonwealth or of any political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from
the revenues resulting from the issuance of bonds or assets of the authority.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 148 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Continue to operate and maintain the facilities and amenities on General
Burnside Island State Park in the usual and customary manner until an
agreement between BIDA and a private partner to provide such services
takes effect, upon which time the department shall provide for an orderly
transition of its administrative and management functions to BIDA and its
private partner. The department shall continue to operate and maintain any
facilities and amenities not subject to the public-private partnership
agreement between BIDA and its private partner;
(b) Provide technical assistance to BIDA to achieve the legislative intent of
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, including but not limited to procurement,
contracting, administrative, and marketing support;
(c) In collaboration with BIDA, negotiate in good faith the renewals of any
lease agreements with the United States Army Corps of Engineers on and in
Page 9 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
the vicinity of General Burnside Island State Park and assign such
agreements to BIDA or otherwise permit BIDA to carry out all functions in
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act on the lands leased from the United States Army
Corps of Engineers;
(d) Within thirty (30) days of notification from the chair of the BIDA board that
construction of lodging and restaurant facilities are substantially complete,
redesignate the General Burnside Island State Park as the General
Burnside Island State Resort Park; and
(e) Both before and after paragraph (d) of this subsection is met, continue to
include General Burnside Island State Park and the General Burnside
Island State Resort Park in the state park system.
(2) The department shall not develop lodging or restaurant facilities or additional
recreational or entertainment facilities on General Burnside Island State Park
without the express written permission of the BIDA board.
Section 7. KRS 132.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When any real or personal property which is exempt from taxation is leased or
possession is otherwise transferred to a natural person, association, partnership, or
corporation in connection with a business conducted for profit, the leasehold or
other interest in the property shall be subject to state and local taxation at the rate
applicable to real or personal property levied by each taxing jurisdiction.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to interests in:
(a) Industrial buildings, as defined under KRS 103.200, owned and financed by a
tax-exempt governmental unit or tax-exempt statutory authority under the
provisions of KRS Chapter 103, the taxation of which is provided for under
the provisions of KRS 132.020 and 132.200;
(b) Federal property for which payments are made in lieu of taxes in amounts
equivalent to taxes which might otherwise be lawfully assessed;
Page 10 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
(c) Property of any state-supported educational institution;
(d) Vending stand locations and facilities operated by blind persons under the
auspices of the Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise, regardless of
whether the property is owned by the federal, state, or a local government;
(e) Property of any free public library;
(f) Property in Fayette County, Kentucky, administered by the Department of
Military Affairs, Bluegrass Station Division;
(g) All privately owned leasehold interests in residential property when the
residential property is owned in fee simple by a purely public charity as of
July 1, 2020:
1. When the real property includes a residential property unit that is:
a. Leased by the purely public charity for a period of at least one (1)
year to an individual person who is fifty-five (55) years of age or
older;
b. Maintained as the individual person's permanent residence under a
lease agreement that:
i. Prohibits the lessee from subleasing the unit; and
ii. Provides that the lessee's possessory interest in the unit is
terminable by the lessor upon the death of the lessee, the
physical or mental inability of the lessee to continue to reside
in the unit, or the lessee's relocation to a nursing home or
similar assisted living facility; and
c. Constructed on or before July 1, 2020, or constructed after July 1,
2020, on land that was privately owned in fee simple by the purely
public charity on or before July 1, 2020;
2. If the fee simple ownership is transferred by the purely public charity
after July 1, 2020, it shall be transferred to another purely public charity
Page 11 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
and the requirements established for the residential property unit in
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be maintained; and
3. The taxation of which is provided for under KRS 132.020 and 132.200;[
or]
(h) All privately owned leasehold interests in residential property owned in fee
simple by a purely public charity, which is exempt from ad valorem taxation
under Kentucky Constitution Section 170, when the residential property unit
is leased by the purely public charity to an individual person who is:
1. Receiving medical or educational supportive services from the purely
public charity; and
2. a. A postsecondary educational participant;
b. A minor;
c. Sick, disabled, or impoverished; or
d. Over the age of sixty-five (65); or
(i) Any interest in property or facilities developed, acquired, or leased under
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
(3) Taxes shall be assessed to lessees of exempt real or personal property and collected
in the same manner as taxes assessed to owners of other real or personal property,
except that taxes due under this section shall not become a lien against the property.
When due, such taxes shall constitute a debt due from the lessee to the state, county,
school district, special district, or urban-county government for which the taxes
were assessed and if unpaid shall be recoverable by the state as provided in KRS
Chapter 134.
Section 8. Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of Section 3 of this Act, the
initial terms of the BIDA board members appointed by the Governor shall be staggered as
follows:
(1) One representative appointed from a list of persons submitted by the mayor of
Page 12 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 471
the City of Burnside shall serve an initial term of three years, and the other shall serve an
initial term of two years;
(2) One representative appointed from a list of persons submitted by the county
judge/executive of Pulaski County shall serve an initial term of two years and the other
shall serve an initial term of one year.
Page 13 of 13
BR047100.100 - 471 - XXXX 3/17/2026 2:43 PM Jacketed